Vermont, session 2025-2026, S108.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 3581 is amended to read:
§ 3581. GENERAL REQUIREMENTS
* * *
VT LEG #381098 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.108
2025 Page 2 of 4
(c)(1) A mandatory license fee surcharge of $4.00 $6.00 per license shall
be collected by each city, town, or village for the purpose of funding the dog,
cat, and wolf-hybrid spaying and neutering program Dog, Cat, and Wolf-
Hybrid Spaying and Neutering Program established in chapter 193, subchapter
6 of this title chapter.
(2) An optional license fee surcharge of up to $10.00 per license is to be
implemented by the legislative body of a city, town, or village that has
established an animal and rabies control program for the sole purpose of
funding the rabies control program.
(3) The license fee surcharges in this subsection shall not be considered
part of the license fee for purposes of calculating a penalty for late payment.
* * *
Sec. 2. DOG, CAT, AND WOLF-HYBRID SPAYING AND NEUTERING
PROGRAM; CO-PAYMENT
A pet owner utilizing the Dog, Cat, and Wolf-Hybrid Spaying and
Neutering Program established in 20 V.S.A. chapter 193, subchapter 6 shall
provide a minimum co-payment of $50.00 per companion animal.
Sec. 3. TRANSFER OF RULEMAKING AUTHORITY; AMENDMENT
(a) The statutory authority to adopt the rule on Dog, Cat, and Wolf-Hybrid
Spaying and Neutering Program and Fund (CVR 20-010-011) by the Agency
of Agriculture, Food and Markets pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 is
VT LEG #381098 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.108
2025 Page 3 of 4
transferred to the Department for Children and Families’ Office of Economic
Opportunity. This rule shall be deemed a rule of the Department for Children
and Families’ Office of Economic Opportunity and remain in effect until
amended or repealed by the Department for Children and Families’ Office of
Economic Opportunity pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25. The Department for
Children and Families’ Office of Economic Opportunity shall provide notice of
the transfer to the Secretary of State and the Legislative Committee on
Administrative Rules in accordance with 3 V.S.A. § 848(d)(2).
(b) The Department for Children and Families’ Office of Economic
Opportunity shall amend the rule on the Dog, Cat, and Wolf-Hybrid Spaying
and Neutering Program and Fund (CVR 20-010-011) pursuant to 3 V.S.A.
chapter 25 to:
(1) reflect the pet owner co-payment established in Sec. 2 of this act;
(2) include “rabbit” in the definition of “companion animal”;
(3) increase to five the number of companion animals per owner that
may be served by the Program;
(4) ensure veterinarians’ predetermined fee schedule is kept confidential
from the public;
(5) ensure that veterinarians’ predetermined fee schedule covers
distemper and rabies vaccinations;
VT LEG #381098 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.108
2025 Page 4 of 4
(6) increase to eight weeks the length of time that a pet owner voucher is
valid;
(7) specify that veterinarians shall be reimbursed within 30 days
following the Office of Economic Opportunity’s receiving an invoice; and
(8) require that the names of participating veterinarians are posted on the
Program’s website.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381098 v.1